nb: Tilbehør til dempertrener inkludert: Unbrakonøkkel; Karabinkrok; Takfeste; Døranker; Forlengelsesstropp; Fotslynge; Instruksjonsguide; Monteringsutstyr; Oppbevarings-/bæreveske; Sugekoppbase; Annet
fr: Accessoires inclus avec le système d’entraînement en suspension: Clé Allen; Mousqueton; Support de plafond; Ancrage de porte; Sangle d’extension; Berceau pour pied; Guide d’instructions; Matériel de montage; Sac de rangement/transport; Base à ventouse; Autre
sl-SI: Vključeni dodatki za trenažer s trakovi: Inbus ključ; Vponka; Stropni nosilec; Sidro za vrata; Podaljšek traku; Zanka za noge; Vodnik z navodili; Strojna oprema za montažo; Torba za shranjevanje / prenašanje; Osnova s priseskom; Drugo
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ προπόνησης ανάρτησης: Κλειδί Άλεν; Καραμπίνερ; Βάση οροφής; Άγκιστρο πόρτας; Ιμάντας προέκτασης; Υποδοχή ποδιού; Εγχειρίδιο οδηγιών; Εξαρτήματα στερέωσης; Τσάντα αποθήκευσης/μεταφοράς; Βάση με βεντούζα; Άλλο
de: Enthaltenes Zubehör für den Suspension Trainer: Inbusschlüssel; Karabiner; Deckenhalterung; Türanker; Verlängerungsgurt; Fußschlaufe; Bedienungsanleitung; Montagezubehör; Aufbewahrungs-/Tragetasche; Saugnapfbasis; Sonstige
es: Accesorios de entrenamiento de suspensión incluidos: Llave Allen; Mosquetón; Soporte de techo; Anclaje para puerta; Correa de extensión; Soporte para el pie; Guía de instrucciones; Hardware de montaje; Bolsa de almacenamiento o transporte; Base con ventosa; Otro
ja: サスペンショントレーナー付属アクセサリー: 六角レンチ; カラビナ; 天井マウント; ドアアンカー; エクステンションストラップ; フットクレードル; 取扱説明書; 取付金具; 収納/キャリーバッグ; 吸盤ベース; その他
zh-TW: 包含懸掛訓練配件: 內六角扳手; 登山扣; 天花板支架; 門擋; 延長帶; 足部吊環; 說明指南; 安裝五金; 收納/攜行袋; 吸盤底座; 其他
ru: Аксессуары для тренажера с подвесной системой в комплекте: Шестигранный ключ; Карабин; Потолочное крепление; Дверное крепление; Удлинительный ремень; Петля для ног; Руководство пользователя; Крепежная фурнитура; Сумка для хранения/переноски; Основание на присосках; Другое
lt-LT: Įtraukti pakabinamo treniruoklio priedai: Šešiabriaunis raktas; Karabinas; Tvirtinimas prie lubų; Durų inkaras; Pailginimo diržas; Pėdų kilpos; Instrukcijų vadovas; Tvirtinimo elementai; Laikymo / nešiojimo krepšys; Pagrindas su siurbtukais; Kitas
pl: Akcesoria do trenażera podwieszanego w zestawie: Klucz imbusowy; Karabińczyk; Mocowanie sufitowe; Kotwa do drzwi; Taśma przedłużająca; Uchwyt na stopę; Instrukcja obsługi; Elementy montażowe; Torba transportowa/do przechowywania; Podstawa z przyssawkami; Inne
tr: Dahil olan askı antrenman aleti aksesuarları: Allen Anahtarı; Karabina; Tavana Montaj Aparatı; Kapı Çapası; Uzatma Kayışı; Ayak Beşiği; Kullanım Kılavuzu; Montaj Donanımı; Saklama/Taşıma Çantası; Vantuzlu Taban; Diğer
it: Accessori del sistema di allenamento in sospensione inclusi: Chiave a brugola; Moschettone; Supporto a soffitto; Ancoraggio per porta; Cinghia di estensione; Staffa per piede; Guida didattica; Hardware di montaggio; Borsa per conservazione/trasporto; Base a ventosa; Altro
nl: Suspension trainer meegeleverde accessoires: Inbussleutel; Karabijnhaak; Plafondbevestiging; Deuranker; Verlengband; Voetsteun; Instructiegids; Bevestigingsmateriaal; Opberg-/draagtas; Zuignapbasis; Overig
hu: Felfüggesztéses edzőheveder tartozékai: Imbuszkulcs; Karabiner; Mennyezeti tartó; Ajtóhorgony; Hosszabbítópánt; Lábheveder; Útmutató; Rögzítőelemek; Tároló-/hordozótáska; Tapadókorongos alap; Egyéb
zh-CN: 悬挂训练器附带配件: 内六角扳手; 登山扣; 天花板支架; 门锚; 延长带; 脚踏环; 指南说明; 安装硬件; 储物袋/手提袋; 吸盘底座; 其他
da: Medfølgende tilbehør til suspension trainer: Unbrakonøgle; Karabinhage; Loftsbeslag; Døranker; Forlængerstrop; Fodstrop; Instruktionsvejledning; Monteringshardware; Opbevarings-/bæretaske; Sugekopbase; Andet
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za trenažer s trakama: Imbus ključ; Karabiner; Stropni nosač; Sidro za vrata; Produžna traka; Držač za stopala; Vodič s uputama; Oprema za montažu; Torba za pohranu/nošenje; Vakuumski nosač; Ostalo
sv: Tillbehör för upphängningstränare ingår: Insexnyckel; Karbinhake; Takfäste; Dörrankare; Förlängningsrem; Fotvagga; Instruktionsguide; Monteringsutrustning; Förvarings-/bärväska; Sugproppsbas; Övrigt
ro-RO: Accesorii incluse pentru corzile de antrenament prin suspendare: Cheie imbus; Carabinieră; Suport pentru tavan; Ancoră pentru ușă; Curea de extensie; Suport pentru picioare; Ghid de instrucțiuni; Accesorii de montaj; Geantă de depozitare/transport; Bază cu ventuză; Altele
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเครื่องฝึกแบบแขวนรวมอยู่ด้วย: ประแจหกเหลี่ยม; คาราบิเนอร์; ตัวยึดเพดาน; ที่ยึดประตู; สายต่อขยาย; ห่วงรองเท้า; คู่มือการใช้งาน; อุปกรณ์ติดตั้ง; กระเป๋าเก็บของ/กระเป๋าพกพา; ฐานจุกสุญญากาศ; อื่นๆ
ko: 포함된 서스펜션 트레이너 액세서리: 육각 렌치; 카라비너; 천장 마운트; 도어 앵커; 연장 스트랩; 풋 크래들; 사용 안내서; 마운팅 하드웨어; 보관/휴대용 가방; 흡착판 베이스; 기타
en: Suspension trainer accessories included: Allen Wrench; Carabiner; Ceiling Mount; Door Anchor; Extension Strap; Foot Cradle; Instructional Guide; Mounting Hardware; Storage/Carry Bag; Suction Cup Base; Other
cs: Včetně příslušenství pro závěsný trenažér.: Imbusový klíč; Karabina; Stropní úchyt; Kotva do dveří; Prodlužovací popruh; Kolébka na nohy; Návod; Montážní kování; Úložná / přenosná taška; Přísavná základna; Jiné
vi: Bao gồm phụ kiện cho dụng cụ tập luyện treo.: Cờ lê Allen; Móc carabiner; Ngàm gắn trần; Neo cửa; Dây đai mở rộng; Vòng đỡ chân; Hướng dẫn sử dụng; Trang thiết bị lắp ráp; Túi đựng/túi xách; Đế giác hút; Khác
pt-PT: Acessórios incluídos no treinador de suspensão: Chave sextavada; Mosquetão; Suporte de teto; Âncora de porta; Tira de extensão; Suporte para pés; Guia de instruções; Equipamento de montagem; Saco de arrumação/transporte; Base com ventosa; Outro
pt-BR: Treinador de suspensão acessórios incluídos: Chave Allen; Mosquetão; Suporte de teto; Âncora de porta; Tira de extensão; Suporte para os pés; Guia de instruções; Ferragens de montagem; Bolsa de armazenamento/transporte; Base de ventosa; Outros
fi: Mukana toimitettavat suspension trainer -lisävarusteet: Kuusiokoloavain; Karbiinihaka; Kattokiinnike; Oviankkuri; Jatkohihna; Jalkatuki; Käyttöohje; Kiinnityslaitteisto; Säilytys-/kantokassi; Imukuppijalusta; Muu
sk-SK: Príslušenstvo pre závesný posilňovač je súčasťou balenia: Imbusový kľúč; Karabína; Stropný držiak; Kotva do dverí; Predlžovací popruh; Slučka na nohy; Návod; Montážne príslušenstvo; Taška na uskladnenie/prenášanie; Prísavný podstavec; Iné
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за тренажор за окачване: Шестограм; Карабинер; Стойка за таван; Котва за врата; Удължаваща лента; Опора за крака; Ръководство с инструкции; Монтажен хардуер; Чанта за съхранение/пренасяне; Основа с вендуза; Друго